Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-616
Manufacturer-distributor, defined.

Manufacturer-distributor shall mean any individual, sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation which assembles, produces, makes, prints, or supplies lottery equipment or supplies for sale, use, or distribution in this state.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 57;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 115.